District of Columbia statutes.
1-305.01

Cleaning streets, alleys, and avenues; maintenance of sewers.

The sweeping, cleaning, and removing all refuse and filthy accumulations in the streets, alleys, and avenues of the City of Washington, and the repairs and cleaning of the sewers, are necessary municipal objects, which belong to the current expenses of the same, to be paid for in money as other ordinary municipal expenses.

Mar. 1, 1875, 18 Stat. 337, ch. 117
Feb. 11, 1895, 28 Stat. 650, ch. 79
Collection and disposal of garbage, see § 8-701 et seq.
Highways and sewers, regulations governing repair, see § 9-101.01.
Removal of snow and ice, public property, see § 9-601 et seq.
1981 Ed., § 1-329.
1973 Ed., § 1-235.